Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4712
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 12.